Tennessee statutes. Title 15 Holidays and Days of Special Observance
Chapter 2

Days of Special Observance

15-2-101. Additional special observance days.

Each year the following days are days of special observance: January 19, “Robert E. Lee Day”; February 12, “Abraham Lincoln Day”; March 15, “Andrew Jackson Day”; June 3, “Memorial Day” or “Confederate Decoration Day”; July 13, “Nathan Bedford Forrest Day”; and November 11, “Veterans' Day.” The people of this state are invited to observe the days in schools, churches, and other suitable places with appropriate ceremonies expressive of the public sentiment befitting the anniversary of such dates.

Acts 1931, ch. 2, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 7520.1; Acts 1953, ch. 91, § 1; impl. am. Act of Congress, June 1, 1954, ch. 250; Acts 1969, ch. 166, § 3; 1973, ch. 23, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 55-204; Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “the following days are” for “it is the duty of the governor of this state to proclaim the following as” and "people of this state are invited" for “governor shall invite the people of this state”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

Cross-References. Free sport fishing day, §70-2-109.

School holidays and observances, §49-6-3016.

15-2-102. Mothers' Day.

The second Sunday of May of each year is to be especially observed as “Mothers' Day.”

Acts 1919, ch. 16, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 2708a19; mod. Code 1932, § 108; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 55-201; Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 2.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “Mothers' Day” for “‘Mothers' Day’, to be proclaimed as such by the governor”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-103. Statehood Day.

June 1 of each year is declared an historical day to commemorate the admission of the state into the Union, such day to be known as “Statehood Day”; provided, that this day is not a legal holiday.

Acts 1929, ch. 13, § 1; mod. Code 1932, § 109; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 55-202.

Cross-References. Holidays, title 15, ch. 1.

15-2-104. Family Day.

The last Sunday in August of each year is to be especially observed as “Family Day,” to bring attention and honor to the importance of the family as the basis of our state and nation.

Acts 1990, ch. 665, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 4.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor” preceding “to bring” in the middle.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-105. Franklin D. Roosevelt Day.

January 30 of each year is to be observed as “Franklin D. Roosevelt Day,” to honor and recognize President Roosevelt as the father of the civilian conservation corps. Such day shall not be a legal holiday as defined in §15-1-101.

Acts 1992, ch. 1001, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 4.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor” preceding “honor” in the middle.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-106. American Indian Day.

The fourth Monday in September of each year is to be especially observed in Tennessee as “American Indian Day,” and that on this day schools, clubs, and civic and religious organizations are encouraged to recognize the contributions of American Indians with suitable ceremony and fellowship designed to promote greater understanding and brotherhood between American Indians and the non-Indian people of this state.

The people of this state are invited and urged to observe American Indian Day with suitable ceremony and fellowship.

The department of education shall provide, within the limits of funds available for such purpose, information available to all people of this state regarding American Indian Day.

Acts 1994, ch. 606, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 3.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (b), deleted “The governor shall, prior to the fourth Monday in September of each year, issue a proclamation inviting and urging” preceding “The people”, inserted “are invited and urged” and made a stylistic change; in (c), substituted “shall provide” for “and the commission of Indian affairs shall make” and deleted “and the observance thereof.” following “American Indian Day.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-107. Tennessee P.O.W.-M.I.A. Recognition Week.

The week beginning the third Friday of September and extending through the following Thursday of each year shall be designated as “Tennessee P.O.W.-M.I.A. Recognition Week” in recognition of the sacrifices of the citizens who were captured by the enemy or are missing in action.

Acts 1994, ch. 713, § 2; 2000, ch. 673, § 1.

Cross-References. Display of P.O.W.-M.I.A. flag over state capitol, §58-4-301.

15-2-108. Scottish, Scots-Irish Heritage Day.

June 24 of each year is to be observed as “Scottish, Scots-Irish Heritage Day,” to honor and recognize the contributions people of Scottish and Scots-Irish heritage made to the founding and development of Tennessee. Such day shall not be a legal holiday as defined in §15-1-101.

Acts 1995, ch. 233, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 4.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor” preceding “to honor” near the middle.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-109. Workers' Memorial Day.

April 28 of each year is to be observed as “Workers' Memorial Day,” to honor and recognize workers killed and injured on the job. This day shall not be a legal holiday as defined in §15-1-101.

Acts 2000, ch. 689, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 4.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor” preceding “to honor” near the middle.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-110. John Sevier Day.

June 23 of each year shall be observed as “John Sevier Day,” to honor and recognize John Sevier for his important role in Tennessee attaining statehood and his meritorious service as the state's first governor. This day shall not be a legal holiday as defined in §15-1-101.

Acts 2001, ch. 49, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. This section is a recognition of the legendary status of Governor John Sevier in Tennessee history as a renowned frontiersman, soldier and public servant with distinctive service as the first governor of the state of Tennessee.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor” preceding “to honor” near the beginning of the sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-111. Harriet Tubman Day.

March 10 of each year shall be observed as “Harriet Tubman Day,” to honor and recognize Harriet Tubman for her important role in the history of Tennessee and the United States as an abolitionist and champion of equal rights for all people. This day shall not be a legal holiday as defined in §15-1-101.

Acts 2007, ch. 2, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding Harriet Tubman Day in Tennessee, please refer to Acts 2007, ch. 2.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor” preceding “to honor” near the beginning of the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-112. Bluegrass Day.

The fourth Saturday in May of each year shall be observed as “Bluegrass Day,” to honor and recognize bluegrass music, its great beauty and artistry, and its prominent place in Tennessee's proud heritage and present day economy. This day shall not be a legal holiday as defined in §15-1-101.

Acts 2007, ch. 12, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding Bluegrass Day in Tennessee, please refer to Acts 2007, ch. 12.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor,” preceding “to honor” near the beginning of the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-113. Emancipation Day.

August 8 of each year shall be observed as “Emancipation Day,” to honor and recognize the celebration of the action of Andrew Johnson in freeing Andrew Johnson's personal slaves on August 8, 1863, and the significance of emancipation in the history of Tennessee. This day shall not be a legal holiday as defined in §15-1-101.

Acts 2007, ch. 15, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble regarding Emancipation Day in Tennessee, please refer to Acts 2007, ch. 15.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor,” preceding “to honor” near the beginning of the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-114. Patriots’ Day.

April 19 of each year shall be observed as “Patriots' Day,” to honor and recognize the opening events of the War of the Revolution and the struggle through which the nation passed in its early days. This day shall not be a legal holiday as defined in §15-1-101.

Acts 2008, ch. 609, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 5.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2008, ch. 610, 1 purported to add a new section concerning Wilma Rudolph Day as §15-2-114. Since Acts 2008, ch. 609, § 1 added §15-2-114, ch. 610 was added as §15-2-115.

Acts 2008, ch. 613, § 1 purported to add a new section concerning Vietnam Veterans Day as §15-2-114. Since Acts 2008, ch. 609, § 1 added §15-2-114, ch. 613 was added as §15-2-116.

Acts 2008, ch. 679, § 1 purported to add a new section concerning Towing and Recovery Week as §15-2-114. Since Acts 2008, ch. 609, § 1 added §15-2-114, ch. 679 was added as §15-2-117.

Acts 2008, ch. 702, § 1 purported to add a new section concerning Tennessee and United States Constitutions Day as §15-2-114. Since Acts 2008, ch. 609, § 1 added §15-2-114, ch. 702 was added as §15-2-118.

Acts 2008, ch. 845, § 1 purported to add a new section concerning Firefighters' Memorial Day as §15-2-114. Since Acts 2008, ch. 609, § 1 added §15-2-114, ch. 845 was added as §15-2-119.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor,” preceding “to honor” near the beginning of the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-115. Wilma Rudolph Day.

June 23 of each year shall be observed as “Wilma Rudolph Day,” to honor and recognize the late Wilma Rudolph for her inspirational example in overcoming childhood disability to excel as an athlete, her numerous athletic accomplishments, including winning three gold medals at the 1960 Olympics, her courage in combating segregation, and her humanitarian work as a United States goodwill ambassador. This day shall not be a legal holiday as defined in §15-1-101.

Acts 2008, ch. 610, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 5.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2008, ch. 610, § 1 purported to add this section as §15-2-114. Acts 2008, ch. 609, 1 added §15-2-114; therefore, the code commission added this section as §15-2-115.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act establishing Wilma Rudolph Day in Tennessee, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 610.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor,” preceding “to honor” near the beginning of the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-116. Vietnam Veterans Day.

March 29 of each year shall be observed as “Vietnam Veterans Day,” to honor and recognize the veterans who served during the Vietnam War. State agencies, interested organizations and groups and individuals are encouraged to fly the United States flag accompanied by the MIA/POW flag on this day. This day shall not be a legal holiday as defined in §15-1-101.

Acts 2008, ch. 613, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 5.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2008, ch. 613, § 1 purported to add this section as §15-2-114. Acts 2008, ch. 609, § 1 added §15-2-114; therefore, the code commission added this section as §15-2-116.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor,” preceding “to honor” near the beginning of the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-117. Towing and Recovery Week.

The week that includes the third Saturday in September shall be observed as “Towing and Recovery Week” in this state, to honor the thousands of operators, manufacturers, suppliers, and other dedicated men and women who serve our state's motoring public with courtesy and courage while promoting safety on our roads and highways. This week shall not be a legal holiday as defined in §15-1-101.

Acts 2008, ch. 679, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 5.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2008, ch. 679, § 1 purported to add a new section concerning Towing and Recovery Week as §15-2-114. Since Acts 2008, ch. 609, § 1 added §15-2-114, ch. 679 was added as §15-2-117.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding “Towing and Recovery Week,” please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 679.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor,” preceding “to honor” near the beginning of the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-118. Tennessee and United States Constitutions Day.

September 17 of each year shall be observed as “Tennessee and United States Constitutions Day,” to honor and commemorate the creation and signing of the supreme laws of our state and land on June 1, 1796, and September 17, 1787. This day shall not be a legal holiday as defined in §15-1-101.

Acts 2008, ch. 702, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 5.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2008, ch. 702, § 1 purported to add a new section concerning Tennessee and United States Constitutions Day as §15-2-114. Since Acts 2008, ch. 609, § 1 added §15-2-114, ch. 702 was added as §15-2-118.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor,” preceding “to honor” near the beginning of the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-119. Firefighters' Memorial Day.

October 9 of each year shall be observed as “Firefighters' Memorial Day,” to honor and recognize firefighters in this state for their courageous and dedicated service. This day shall not be a legal holiday as defined in §15-1-101.

Acts 2008, ch. 845, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 5.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2008, ch. 845, § 1 purported to add a new section concerning Firefighters' Memorial Day as §15-2-114. Since Acts 2008, ch. 609, § 1, added §15-2-114, ch. 845 was added as §15-2-119.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act establishing Firefighters' Memorial Day in Tennessee, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 845.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor,”preceding “to honor” near the beginning of the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-120. Gold Star Mother's Day.

The last Sunday in September of each year shall be observed as “Gold Star Mother's Day,” to honor Tennessee's Gold Star Mothers for their courage, resolve and strength in the face of great personal loss. State agencies, interested organizations and groups and individuals are encouraged to fly the United States flag on this day as a public expression of our state's sympathy and respect for our Gold Star Mothers. This day shall not be a legal holiday as defined in §15-1-101.

Acts 2009, ch. 93, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act establishing Gold Star Mother's Day in Tennessee, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 93.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor,” preceding “to honor” near the beginning of the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-121. Volunteer Firefighters Week — Rescue Squad Week.

The first full week in March of each year shall be observed as “Volunteer Firefighters Week,” to honor and recognize volunteer firefighters in this state for their courageous and dedicated service. This week shall not be a legal holiday as defined in § 15-1-101.

The third full week in May of each year shall also be observed as “Rescue Squad Week,” to honor and recognize rescue squad personnel in this state for their tireless and invaluable service. Such week shall not be a legal holiday as defined in § 15-1-101.

Acts 2011, ch. 38, § 1; 2012, ch. 855, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 5.

Compilers Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning state observance of a “Volunteer Firefighters Week,” please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 38.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the designation of Rescue Squad Week, please refer to Acts 2012, ch. 855.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor,” preceding “to honor” in the middle of the first sentence of (a) and (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

Cross-References. Compensation for death of emergency responder in line of duty, §7-51-210.

Firefighters' Memorial Day, § 15-2-119.

Firefighting training and standards, title 4, chapter 24.

15-2-122. Tennessee National Guard Day.

March 3 of each year shall be observed as “Tennessee National Guard Day,” to honor and recognize Tennessee national guard personnel for their service and sacrifices in defense of our nation and for responding to domestic missions within the borders of our state. This day shall not be a legal holiday as defined in §15-1-101.

Acts 2012, ch. 574, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 4.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor” preceding “to honor” in the middle of the first sentence of (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-123. Lymphedema Awareness Week.

The third week of June each year shall be observed as “Lymphedema Awareness Week,” to encourage all medical facilities in the state to dedicate more time, energy, and funding to the diagnosing and treatment of the disease. This week shall not be a legal holiday as defined in §15-1-101.

Acts 2013, ch. 22, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning Lymphedema Awareness Week, please refer to Acts 2013, ch. 22.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor,” preceding “to encourage” in the middle of the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-124. Transverse Myelitis Awareness Day.

June 6 of each year shall be observed as “Transverse Myelitis Awareness Day,” to raise public awareness about this debilitating neurological spinal cord disorder. This day shall not be a legal holiday, as defined in §15-1-101.

Acts 2014, ch. 598, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act concerning Transverse Myelitis Awareness Day, please refer to Acts 2014, ch. 598.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor,” preceding “to raise” in the middle of the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-125. Police Memorial Day.

May 11 of each year shall be observed as “Police Memorial Day,” to honor and recognize law enforcement officers in this state for their dedication and selfless service. This day shall not be a legal holiday as defined in §15-1-101.

Acts 2015, ch. 49, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning recognition of law enforcement officers, see Acts 2015, ch. 49.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor,” preceding “to honor” in the middle of the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-126. Agriculture Literacy Week.

The week that includes the third Thursday in November each year shall be designated “Agriculture Literacy Week” in Tennessee, to promote agricultural literacy and the need to educate students about the importance of agriculture to our state and our nation. This week shall not be a legal holiday as defined in §15-1-101.

Acts 2015, ch. 75, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the importance of educating students about agriculture, see Acts 2015, ch. 75.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor,” preceding “to promote” in the middle of the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-127. Tennessee Missing Children's Day.

March 4 of each year shall be observed as “Tennessee Missing Children's Day,” to raise public awareness about child abduction and sexual exploitation and to promote public education efforts as to appropriate protective measures, and ways to respond and seek help from law enforcement, social services, and the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children. This day shall not be a legal holiday, as defined in §15-1-101.

Acts 2017, ch. 6, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning observance of Tennessee Missing Children's Day, please refer to Acts 2017, ch. 6.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor,” preceding “to raise” in the middle of the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-128. Tennessee Rural Mayor's Day.

The first Monday of October of each year shall be observed as “Tennessee Rural Mayor's Day,” to honor and recognize mayors of small cities in this state for their tireless work and dedicated service to their respective communities. This day shall not be a legal holiday as defined in §15-1-101.

Acts 2017, ch. 176, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 4.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor” preceding “to honor” in the middle of the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-129. Tennessee Songwriters Week.

The last full week of February each year must be observed as “Tennessee Songwriters Week,” to promote Tennessee's musical heritage by recognizing the contributions of past and present songwriters to this state.

Acts 2018, ch. 578, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For Preamble to act concerning Tennessee Songwriters Week, see Acts 2018, ch. 578.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor,” preceding “to promote” near the middle of this section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-130. Febb Burn Day.

August 18 of each year shall be observed as “Febb Burn Day,” to honor Febb Burn's role in the enfranchisement of women. This day shall not be a legal holiday as defined in §15-1-101.

Acts 2018, ch. 589, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. For the preamble to the act establishing Febb Burn Day in Tennessee, please refer to Acts 2018, ch. 589.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor” preceding “to honor” near the middle of the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-131. Financial Literacy Week.

The week beginning on the first Sunday in April each year is designated “Financial Literacy Week” in Tennessee, to promote financial literacy and the need to educate Tennesseans about the importance of personal financial health to Tennessee's future prosperity.

Acts 2019, ch. 37, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 5.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor,” preceding “to promote” in the middle.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 37 § 2. March 22, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-132. Mrs. Rosa L. Parks Day.

December 1 of each year is to be observed as “Mrs. Rosa L. Parks Day” to honor and recognize Mrs. Rosa L. Parks for her important role in the civil rights movement in the United States. This day is not a legal holiday as defined in §15-1-101.

Acts 2019, ch. 122, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 5.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor,” preceding “to honor” near the middle of the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 122, § 2. April 9, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-133. Post-Traumatic Stress Injury Awareness Day.

June 27 of each year is to be observed as “Post-Traumatic Stress Injury Awareness Day,” to promote awareness of persons suffering from post-traumatic stress injury.

Acts 2019, ch. 137, § 1; 2020, ch. 707, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning post-traumatic stress injury, see Acts 2019, ch. 137.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “to be proclaimed as such by the governor,” preceding “to promote” in the middle.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 137, § 2. April 9, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 707, § 7. June 22, 2020.

15-2-134. Women's Suffrage Day.

August 18 of each year is to be observed as “Women's Suffrage Day.”

Acts 2020, ch. 709, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 709, § 2. June 22, 2020.